Hawaii statutes.
§507-22 Disputes as to application of
proceeds of sale upon execution; jurisdiction of district courts; appeal.
Where a dispute arises as to the application of the proceeds upon the sale
under execution of property held by a lienor, the court shall order that the
proceeds be paid into court. It shall thereupon determine to or among whom the
proceeds shall be paid or divided. Nothing in section 604-5, limiting the
jurisdiction of district courts, shall be construed as affecting the
adjudication; but an appeal may be taken therefrom as in other civil cases. [L
1921, c 131, §5; RL 1925, §2908; RL 1935, §4375; RL 1945, §8779; RL 1955,
§193-25; HRS §507-22; am L 1972, c 106, §1(f)]

Cross References

Deposit in court, see chapter 655.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next